Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1117
Jury; when discharged.

The jury may be discharged by the court on account of the sickness of a juror, or other accident or calamity requiring their discharge, or by consent of both parties, or after they have been kept together until it satisfactorily appears that there is no probability of their agreeing.

R.S.1867, Code § 288, p. 442;

R.S.1913, § 7856;

C.S.1922, § 8800;

C.S.1929, § 20-1117;

R.S.1943, § 25-1117.